Utah statutes.
59-10-1108.   Refundable motion picture tax credit.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Motion picture company" means a claimant, estate, or trust that meets
the definition of a motion picture company under Section 63M-1-1802.
(b)  "Office" means the Governor's Office of Economic Development.
(c)  "State-approved production" has the same meaning as defined in Subsection
63M-1-1802(10).
(2)  For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2009, a motion picture
company may claim a refundable tax credit for a state-approved production.
(3)  The tax credit under this section is the amount listed as the tax credit
amount on the tax credit certificate that the office issues to a motion
picture company under Section 63M-1-1803 for the taxable year.
(4) (a)  In accordance with any rules prescribed by the commission under
Subsection (4)(b), the commission shall make a refund to a motion picture
company that claims a tax credit under this section if the amount of the tax
credit exceeds the motion picture company's tax liability for the taxable
year.
(b)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may make rules providing procedures for making a refund to
a motion picture company as required by Subsection (4)(a).
(5) (a)  On or before October 1, 2014, and every five years after October 1,
2014, the Utah Tax Review Commission shall study the tax credit allowed by
this section and make recommendations to the Revenue and Taxation Interim
Committee and the Workforce Services and Community and Economic Development
Interim Committee concerning whether the tax credit should be continued,
modified, or repealed.
(b)  For purposes of the study required by this Subsection (5), the office
shall provide the following information to the Utah Tax Review Commission:
(i)  the amount of tax credit the office grants to each taxpayer for each
calendar year;
(ii)  the criteria the office uses in granting a tax credit;
(iii)  the dollars left in the state, as defined in Subsection 63M-1-1802(2),
by each motion picture company for each calendar year;
(iv)  the information contained in the office's latest report to the
Legislature under Section 63M-1-1805; and
(v)  any other information requested by the Utah Tax Review Commission.
(c)  The Utah Tax Review Commission shall ensure that its recommendations
under Subsection (5)(a) include an evaluation of:
(i)  the cost of the tax credit to the state;
(ii)  the effectiveness of the tax credit; and
(iii)  the extent to which the state benefits from the tax credit.
